Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

Speech Language Pathologists and Audiologists

63-17-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Licensure Act for Communication Disorders and Sciences.”

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1701; Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 5; 1995, ch. 481, § 25.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Occupation tax on audiologists and speech pathologists, title 67, ch. 4, part 17.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of unlicensed retailer to make ear impressions or sell hearing aids, OAG 97-168, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 181 (12/16/97).

63-17-102. Purpose.

It is the purpose and intent of the general assembly by this enactment to safeguard the public health, safety and welfare, to protect the public from being misled by incompetent, unscrupulous and unauthorized persons and to protect the public from unprofessional conduct by qualified speech language pathologists and audiologists and hearing instrument specialists, by providing regulatory authority over persons offering speech language pathology, audiology and hearing instrument dispensing services to the public.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1702; Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 5; 1995, ch. 481, §§ 34, 37.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

63-17-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Audiologist” means one who practices audiology or one holding oneself out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “audiologist,” “audiology,” “audiological,” “hearing center,” “hearing clinic,” “hearing clinician,” “hearing therapist” or any similar titles or descriptions of service;

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent or prohibit any hearing instrument specialist from employing and using such terms as “hearing aid center,” “hearing aid clinic,” “hearing instrument center,” “hearing instrument clinic” or any similar titles or descriptions of services, so long as the word “aid” or “instrument” is incorporated in any such title or description of service and insofar as such terms do not connote qualifications or education for which the hearing instrument specialist does not have valid credentials or do not imply rehabilitative or professional services that the hearing instrument specialist is not qualified to offer;

“Board” means the board of communications disorders and sciences;

“Person” means any individual, organization or corporate body except that only individuals can be licensed under this chapter;

“Practice of audiology” means the nonmedical application of principles, methods and procedures for the assessment of the auditory and vestibular systems, including the interpretation of behavioral and physiologic measures, and the design and implementation of programs of hearing conservation and preservation and programs of habilitation and rehabilitation for auditory and vestibular disorders including the assessment, selection, fitting and sale of amplification systems or other assistive devices and technologies;

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person licensed under part 2 of this chapter as a hearing instrument dispenser from engaging in the practice of measuring, testing, appraisal, prediction, counseling and instructions related to fitting, usage and dispensing of hearing instruments;

“Practice of speech language pathology” means the nonmedical application of principles, methods and procedures for the measurement, testing, assessment, prediction, counseling or instruction related to the development and disorders of speech, voice, language or oral, pharyngeal and laryngeal sensorimotor competencies for the purpose of assessing, preventing, treating, ameliorating or modifying such disorders and conditions in individuals and groups of individuals;

The practice of speech language pathology shall include the use of rigid and flexible endoscopes to observe the pharyngeal and laryngeal areas of the throat in order to observe, collect data and measure the parameters of communication and swallowing for the purpose of functional assessment and rehabilitation planning. A speech language pathologist who uses an endoscope shall meet all of the following conditions:

Obtain written verification from a board certified otolaryngologist that the speech language pathologist is competent in the proper and safe use of an endoscope. The otolaryngologist's determination of competency shall be based on the speech language pathologist's training in the proper use of endoscopes, the successful completion of a university course or other educational program of at least fifteen (15) hours on endoscopy and the successful performance of at least twenty-five (25) endoscopic procedures under the supervision of an otolaryngologist or another speech language pathologist who has successfully performed at least fifty (50) endoscopic procedures and has been approved in writing by a board-certified otolaryngologist to provide that supervision. The speech language pathologist shall maintain this written verification on file at all times at the primary practice location of the speech language pathologist;

Not perform a procedure utilizing an endoscope unless the patient has been referred to the speech language pathologist by an otolaryngologist or other qualified physician for the performance of the procedure;

Perform only nonoperative procedures with an endoscope;

Have protocols in place for emergency medical backup for every setting in which the speech language pathologist performs a procedure using an endoscope:

If the procedure is performed in a community setting such as a physician's office, a physician shall be on the premises and provide onsite supervision; and

If the procedure is performed in an institutional setting such as a hospital or nursing home, a physician shall provide general supervision and be readily available in the event of an emergency, including, but not limited to, physical presence at the institution or availability by telephone; and

Send to the referring physician in a timely manner a report and visual recording of each endoscopic procedure performed upon referral of that physician. If the referring physician is not an otolaryngologist, the speech language pathologist shall also provide a visual recording of the endoscopic procedure to an otolaryngologist, if directed to do so by the referring physician;

“Speech language pathologist” means one who practices speech pathology, one who holds out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “speech language pathologist,” “speech pathologist,” “speech pathology,” “speech therapy,” “speech correction,” “speech correctionist,” “speech therapist,” “speech clinic,” “speech clinician,” “language pathologist,” “language pathology,” “language therapist,” “logopedics,” “logopedist,” “communicology,” “communicologist,” “asphasiologist,” “voice therapy,” “voice therapist,” “voice pathology,” “voice pathologist” or “phoniatrist” or any similar titles or description of services; and

“Speech language pathology assistant” means any person who meets minimum qualifications that the board may establish for speech language pathology assistants, which qualifications are less than those established by this chapter as necessary for licensure as a speech language pathologist and who works under the supervision of a licensed speech language pathologist.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-1703; Acts 1989, ch. 269, § 1; 1994, ch. 849, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 481, §§ 26-28, 32, 33; 2005, ch. 330, § 1; 2007, ch. 324, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

63-17-104. Board.

There is hereby created a board of communications disorders and sciences.

The board shall consist of seven (7) members who are appointed by the governor, who are residents of this state, five (5) of whom are currently practicing as speech language pathologists or audiologists and who have been engaged in rendering services, teaching or research in speech language pathology or audiology for a period of at least five (5) years, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer member who is not affiliated with the profession of speech language pathology and audiology and one (1) physician licensed by this state whose medical specialty is otolaryngology.

Of the six (6) nonphysician members of the board, at least two (2) shall be audiologists and at least two (2) shall be speech language pathologists, the fifth member shall be either a speech language pathologist or audiologist and the sixth member shall be a consumer. The five (5) nonphysician members engaged in rendering services, teaching or research in speech language pathology or audiology shall hold an active and valid license in this state.

The members of the board shall serve until the expiration of the term for which they have been appointed or until their successors are qualified. Their appointments shall be made as follows:

Initially, of the six (6) nonphysician members of the board, two (2) shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, two (2) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years and two (2) members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. The consumer member shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. All appointments made thereafter shall be for a term of three (3) years;

The physician member of the board may be selected by the governor from lists of qualified nominees submitted by interested otolaryngology groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Academy of Otolaryngology and shall serve for a term of three (3) years. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the position. If for any reason a vacancy occurs in the office of a physician member of the board, an appointment shall be made as provided in this section, and the person so appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term; and

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The board shall reorganize annually and select a chair and a secretary. Four (4) members of the board constitute a quorum to do business.

The board shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year. Additional meetings may be held upon call of the chair or after the written request of any two (2) members of the board.

All meetings of the board shall be open and public, except that the board may hold executive sessions:

To prepare, approve, grade or administer examinations; and

Upon the request of an applicant who fails an examination, to prepare a response indicating the cause of the applicant's failure.

No person shall be appointed to serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

When a vacancy in the office of one (1) of the five (5) nonphysician members engaged in rendering services, teaching or research in speech language pathology or audiology occurs, interested audiology and speech pathology groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Association of Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists may submit lists of qualified nominees to be considered for the vacancy. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the vacancy.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-1704; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 55; 1992, ch. 814, § 3; 1994, ch. 849, § 6; 1995, ch. 481, §§ 29, 41; 2012, ch. 697, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. The board created by this section is assigned to the division of health related boards in the department of health for all administrative, fiscal, inspectional, clerical and secretarial functions by § 68-1-101.

The board of communication disorders and sciences, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-17-105. Powers and duties of board.

The board is authorized to:

Administer, coordinate and enforce this chapter, evaluate the qualifications of applicants, supervise the examination for applicants, and may issue subpoenas, examine witnesses and administer oaths and shall investigate persons engaging in practices that violate this chapter;

Conduct such hearings and keep such records and minutes as shall be necessary to an orderly dispatch of business;

Adopt and publish responsible rules and regulations, including, but not limited to, regulations that establish ethical standards of practice and may amend or repeal the same; and

Govern and control every person who holds a license or is registered to practice in the field of communication disorders and sciences in this state by the rules of professional conduct adopted by the board.

The conferral or enumeration of specific powers elsewhere in this chapter shall not be construed as a limitation of the general powers conferred by this section.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-1705; Acts 1995, ch. 481, § 38; 2005, ch. 330, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

63-17-106. Compensation of board.

The board members shall receive no compensation for their services, but may receive fifty dollars ($50.00) per diem when actually engaged in the discharge of their official duties and, in addition, shall be reimbursed for all travel and other necessary expenses. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 6; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(122); 1981, ch. 167, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1706.

63-17-107. Employees of board.

The board shall employ and, at its pleasure, discharge, a secretary and such attorneys, inspectors, clerks and any other employees it deems necessary and shall outline their duties and fix their compensation.

The amount of per diem and travel expenses shall be paid in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 7; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(122); T.C.A., § 63-1707.

63-17-108. Seal — Records as evidence.

The board shall adopt a seal by which it shall authenticate its proceedings.

Copies of the proceedings, records and acts of the board and certificates purporting to relate the facts concerning such proceedings, records and acts, signed by the secretary and authenticated by the seal, shall be prima facie evidence in all courts of the state.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-1708.

63-17-109. Disposition of fees — Allotment of funds.

All fees coming into the custody of the board, including examination fees, license fees, renewal fees, fines, penalties and other payments, shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments of the general fund for proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure shall be made by the board until allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. Such allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 9; T.C.A., § 63-1709; modified.

Cross-References. Disposition of fines and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-17-110. License requirements — Qualifications of applicants — Provisional license.

Any person wishing to practice or represent such person as a speech language pathologist or audiologist in this state shall obtain a license from the board. Unless such person obtains a license, it is unlawful for such person to practice or represent such person as a speech language pathologist or audiologist as defined in § 63-17-103; and if that person so practices or represents, the person shall be considered to have violated this chapter.

To be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech language pathologist or audiologist, the applicant must:

Be of good moral character, be eighteen (18) years of age or older and possess at least a master's degree in the area of speech language pathology or audiology obtained from educational institutions approved by the board according to the regulations duly adopted under this chapter;

Pass an examination covering the areas of speech language pathology, audiology and speech and hearing services approved by the board. The board determines the scope of the examinations. Written examinations may be supplemented by such oral examinations as the board determines. An applicant who fails the examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination upon payment of another examination fee; and

Submit evidence of the completion of the educational, clinical experience and employment requirements prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

A person who has completed the educational requirements for licensure as a speech language pathologist and has received at least a master's degree from an approved educational institution may apply for and receive from the board a provisional license to practice as a clinical fellow during the person's period of supervised clinical experience. The board may adopt rules to establish standards and procedures to govern provisional licenses and the provisional license fee.

Until such time as the board has adopted rules to establish standards and procedures to govern provisional licenses, the provisions of Rules and Regulations of the State of Tennessee, Rule 1370-01-.10, governing registration of clinical fellows, apply to persons seeking a provisional license to practice as a clinical fellow during the period of supervised clinical experience.

Any person who, on May 8, 2019, has been registered as a clinical fellow pursuant to Rules and Regulations of the State of Tennessee, Rule 1370-01-.10, is deemed to have a provisional license for the same period of time that the person's registration would be effective under that rule.

A person who applies for licensure as an audiologist on or after January 1, 2009, shall possess a doctoral degree from an accredited educational program approved by the board. The doctoral degree may be a doctor of audiology degree (Au.D.) or other doctoral degree approved by the board. In addition to possessing a doctoral degree, the applicant shall meet the other requirements of subsection (b), except that the doctoral degree shall be in lieu of the master's degree previously required of applicants.

The requirement to have a doctoral degree shall not apply to audiologists who were licensed in this or any other state prior to January 1, 2009.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 10; T.C.A., § 63-1710; Acts 1994, ch. 849, § 7; 2007, ch. 177, § 1; 2019, ch. 318, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c) and redesignated former (c) and (d) as present (d) and (e), respectively.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 318, § 3. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-17-111. Examination of applicants.

Each person desiring to obtain a license from the board shall make application to the board upon a form and in such a manner as the board prescribes in regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. Each applicant shall be examined by the committee and shall pay to the board, at least thirty (30) days prior to the date of the examination, the examination fee prescribed by the board, which fee will not be refunded.

The board may examine by written or oral examination or by both. The examination shall be given at least twice a year at the time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine. Standards for acceptable performance shall be determined by the board.

The board may waive the written examination if the applicant has successfully passed a comparable examination.

The board may examine or direct the applicant to be examined for knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in speech language pathology or audiology as it deems appropriate. It may examine the candidate with regard to the candidate's professional skills and the candidate's judgment in the utilization of speech language pathology or audiology techniques and methods.

The board shall grade the written examination or direct it to be graded and keep the written examination papers for at least one (1) year.

The board shall keep an accurate transcript of the oral examination and keep such transcripts as part of its records for at least one (1) year following the date of examination.

A speech language pathologist or audiologist who holds an American Speech and Hearing Association (ASHA) certification or equivalent, or holds a doctor of audiology degree (Au.D.) from an accredited institution of higher learning and has passed the examination required for licensure under § 63-17-110(b)(2) or is licensed in another state and who has made application to the board for a license in this state may perform activities and services of a speech language pathology or audiological nature without a valid license pending disposition of application.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-1711; Acts 1994, ch. 849, §§ 8, 14; 1995, ch. 481, § 39; 2001, ch. 288, § 1; 2003, ch. 172, § 1.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-112. Issuance of license.

The board shall issue a license to all applicants who meet the requirements of this chapter and who pay to the board the initial license fee.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 12; T.C.A., § 63-1712.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-113. Reciprocity.

The board shall waive the examination and grant a license to an applicant who presents proof of current licensure in a state that has standards equivalent to those of this state.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-1713.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-114. Exemptions.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to:

Prevent a qualified person licensed in this state under any other law from engaging in the profession for which such person is licensed;

Restrict or prevent activities of a speech language pathology or audiology nature or the use of the official title of the position for which they were employed on the part of the following persons:

Persons who hold a valid and current credential as a speech and hearing specialist issued by the department of education; and

Speech language pathologists or audiologists employed by federal governmental agencies; provided, that such persons are performing such activities solely within the confines of, or under the jurisdiction of, the organization in which they are employed and do not offer to render speech language pathology or audiology services as defined in § 63-17-103, to the public outside of the institutions or organizations in which they are employed. However, such persons may, without obtaining a license under this chapter, consult or disseminate their research findings and scientific information to other such accredited academic institutions or governmental agencies. They also may offer lectures to the public for a fee, monetary or otherwise, without being licensed under this chapter;

Restrict the activities and services of a student or a speech language pathology intern in speech language pathology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech language pathology at an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility; provided, that these activities and services constitute a part of the student's supervised course of study and that such persons are designated by such title as “speech language pathology intern,” “speech language pathology trainee” or other such title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to the student's level of training;

Restrict the activities and services of a student of audiology or intern in audiology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in audiology at an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility; provided, that these activities and services constitute a part of the student's supervised course of study and that such person is designated by such title as “audiology intern,” “audiology trainee” or other such title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to the student's level of training;

Restrict a person from another state from offering such person's speech language pathology or audiology services in the state; provided, that such services are performed for no more than five (5) days in any calendar year and that such person meets the qualifications and requirements stated in the section on qualifications and does not sell hearing instruments;

However, a person from another state who is licensed or certified as a speech language pathologist by a similar board of another state, territory of the United States or of a foreign country or province and whose standards are equivalent to, or higher than, at the date of such person's certification or licensure, the requirements of this chapter and regulations duly adopted pursuant to this part or a person who meets the qualifications and requirements and resides in a state or territory of the United States or a foreign country or province that does not grant certification or license to speech language pathologists may also offer speech language pathology services in this state for a total of not more than thirty (30) days in any calendar year without being licensed under this law;

Prevent the activities and services of a speech language pathologist obtaining the pathologist's year of paid professional experience; provided, that such person is under the supervision of a speech language pathologist licensed under this chapter or a speech language pathologist certified under the American Speech and Hearing Association (ASHA). A licensed or ASHA certified speech language pathologist shall not supervise more than three (3) speech language pathologists with a provisional license at any one (1) time;

Restrict the activities and services of an audiologist obtaining the audiologist's year of paid professional experience; provided, that such person is under the supervision of a licensed or ASHA certified audiologist. A licensed or ASHA certified audiologist shall not supervise more than three (3) unlicensed audiologists at any one (1) time;

Restrict the activities and services of a person performing audiometric tests under the direct supervision of a physician licensed to practice by the state board of medical examiners; and

Permit any person licensed by this chapter to practice medicine in any form or in any of its branches. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as applying to physicians licensed under chapters 1 and 6 of this title.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, §§ 14, 22; T.C.A., §§ 63-1714, 63-1722; 63-17-122; Acts 1994, ch. 849, §§ 9, 15; 1995, ch. 481, §§ 31, 42, 43; 2019, ch. 318, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (6), substituted “Prevent” for “Restrict” in the first sentence and, in the second sentence, deleted “unlicensed” following “more than three (3)”, and inserted “with a provisional license” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 318, § 3. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-17-115. Fees.

The amount of fees prescribed in connection with a license as a speech language pathologist or audiologist shall be determined by the board.

An applicant wishing to be licensed in both speech language pathology and audiology shall pay the examination fee for each license. Such individual, however, is required to pay only one (1) initial license fee and only one (1) renewal or delinquency fee; provided, that the applications for the two (2) licenses are submitted simultaneously.

The fees shall be fixed by the board and shall be set forth with the regulations that are duly adopted under this chapter.

Every person to whom a license is issued shall, as a condition precedent to its issuance and in addition to any application, examination or other fee, pay the prescribed initial license fee. The board may, by regulation, provide for the waiver where the license is issued less than forty-five (45) days before the date on which it will expire.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 15; 1976, ch. 496, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1715; Acts 1989, ch. 523, § 63; 1994, ch. 849, § 10.

Cross-References. License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-17-116. Expiration of licenses — Renewal — Retirement.

Each licensed speech language pathologist or audiologist shall pay to the board a fee for a license renewal. The secretary of the board shall notify each licensed speech language pathologist and audiologist each year that such fee is due.

When any licensed speech language pathologist or audiologist fails to register and pay the registration fee within sixty (60) days after registration becomes due, as provided in this section, the license of such person is automatically revoked at the expiration of the sixty (60) days after the registration was required, without further notice or hearing. Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this section may make application in writing to the board for the reinstatement of such license or certificate, and, upon good cause being shown, the board, in its discretion, may reinstate such license upon payment of current renewal fee and upon further payment of a sum to be set by the board.

A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee while the license remains suspended and, until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

A license revoked on disciplinary grounds is subject to expiration as provided in this section, but it may be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition of reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

A person who fails to renew a license within the five (5) years after its expiration may not renew it and it may not be restored, reissued or reinstated thereafter; but, such person may apply for and obtain a new license if such person meets the requirements of this chapter.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person files with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board deems necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (g).

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 17; 1981, ch. 167, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1716; Acts 1986, ch. 675, § 11; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 55-57; 1989, ch. 523, § 64; 1994, ch. 849, § 11.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-17-117. Denial, revocation and suspension of licenses.

The board may refuse to issue a license or may suspend or revoke the license of any licensee if the licensee has been found guilty of unprofessional conduct that has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public. Such unprofessional conduct may include:

Obtaining the license by means of fraud, misrepresentation or concealment of material facts;

Being guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules established by the board or violating the code of ethics adopted and published by the board;

Violating any lawful order, rule or regulation rendered or adopted by the board; or

Violating any provisions of this chapter.

The board shall deny an application for, suspend or revoke or impose probationary conditions upon a license as ordered by the board in any decision made after a hearing as provided in this chapter. One (1) year from the date of revocation of a license under this chapter, application may be made to the board for reinstatement. The board has discretion to accept or reject an application for reinstatement and may require an examination for such reinstatement.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this chapter. However, an action taken under this subsection (c) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 17; T.C.A., § 63-1717; Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 34.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the second sentence in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, §§ 63-6-214.

63-17-118. Charges against licensees and applicants.

Any person, including the board or any member thereof, may prefer charges against any licensee or applicant for license. Such charges shall be in writing and shall be sworn to by the person or persons making them. The charges, unless made by the board, shall be preferred by delivering them to the secretary of the board, who shall furnish all members of the board with a copy. All charges, unless dismissed by the board, shall be heard within a reasonable time after the date upon which they were preferred. The time and place of the hearings shall be fixed by the board.

The complaint shall be in writing and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The name of the licensee or the applicant, the licensee's or applicant's last known address and the number of the licensee's or applicant's license, if known;

The nature of the charges, which, if true, would constitute grounds upon which disciplinary action may be taken;

A statement to inform the respondent that the respondent may but need not be represented by counsel and that the respondent is entitled to the issuance of subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, documents or other evidence relevant to the matter to be heard;

The date and time set for the hearing of the charges and the place where the hearing is to be held; and

The date of the signing of the complaint, which shall be signed by the chair and secretary of the board.

A copy of the complaint shall be served upon the person against whom preferred, whether personally or by registered or certified mail, addressed to the person at the person's last known address as the same appears on the records of the board, at least twenty (20) days before the time fixed for the hearing. Where such personal service cannot be made or where registered or certified mail is returned undelivered, the secretary-treasurer of the board may cause a brief notice to the licensee to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the licensee's last known address, or, if no newspaper is published in the county, the notice may be published in an adjoining county. If the address is in some state, territory or country other than this state, then the notice may be published in Davidson County. Proof of service or of publication shall be filed with the secretary-treasurer and shall be recorded by the secretary-treasurer in the minutes of the board.

The board shall not be bound by strict rules of procedure or by the laws of evidence in the conduct of proceedings, but the determination shall be based upon sufficient legal evidence to sustain it.

The proceeding at the hearing shall be either stenographically or mechanically transcribed.

Oral evidence shall be taken only upon oath or affirmation administered by any member of the board.

Every party to a disciplinary hearing shall have the right to call and examine witnesses and to introduce documentary evidence relevant to the issues of the case.

After the hearing, the board shall consider all the evidence offered and shall decide the issue based upon such evidence. If the decision is for the respondent, the board shall dismiss the proceeding and it shall be so stated in the order entered in the matter.

If the board determines from the evidence and proofs submitted that the respondent is guilty of the charge or charges set forth in the complaint, it may take such action and impose such penalties provided in this chapter as it may deem proper.

Any action of or ruling or order made or entered by the board is subject to review by the courts of this state in the same manner and subject to the rulings, orders and findings of other quasi-judicial bodies and to the same powers and conditions as now provided by law in regard to Tennessee, where not otherwise specifically provided.

Acts 1973, ch. 93, § 18; T.C.A., § 63-1718.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Review of boards and commissions generally, title 27, ch. 9.